Utah statutes.
8-3-1.   Plats of cemeteries must be recorded.
The executive officers of organizations and all individual owners in control
of cemeteries, offering burial lots for sale in any county, shall file and
cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county within
which such cemeteries are situated an accurate plat thereof, which shall
clearly show the sections of burial lots which have been disposed of and the
names of the persons owning or holding the same, and the sections of burial
lots held for disposal; and thereafter such executive officers or owners shall
file additional plats of any additions to such cemeteries before offering for
sale any burial lots therein. County recorders shall not collect any fees for
filing and recording such original plats.
